Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 65

Parking Authority Act

7-65-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Parking Authority Act.”

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 1.

7-65-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” or “parking authority” means any public corporation organized pursuant to this chapter;

“Board” means the governing body of any authority created pursuant to this chapter;

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates or other obligations of an authority issued by its board of directors pursuant to this chapter;

“Executive officer” means, with respect to a city or town, the mayor or other officer of the city or town exercising similar executive powers, and with respect to a county, means the county mayor or other officer of the county exercising similar executive powers;

“Existing parking authority” means any public corporation or body politic and corporate or agency of the state of Tennessee or of any city or town in the state created by special or private act primarily for the purpose of planning, constructing, financing or operating parking facilities;

“Governing body” means the body in which the general legislative powers of a municipality, county, or counties having a metropolitan form of government are vested;

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city or town in this state with respect to which an authority may be organized; and

“Project” means a lot or lots, buildings and structures above, at or below the surface of the earth, including, but not limited to, rights-of-way, equipment, entrances, exits, driveways, approaches, ramps, garages, meters, pedestrian ways, fencing, landscaping and all other facilities and accessories necessary or desirable for or in connection with the parking or storing of vehicles of any kind, and ancillary spaces, uses, and structures related to, located within or adjacent to the facilities and accessories.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

7-65-103. Purpose of chapter — Liberal construction.

It is hereby determined and declared that the free circulation of traffic of all kinds through the streets and roads of counties, cities and towns in this state is necessary to the health, safety and general welfare of the public. It is further determined and declared that the greatly increased use of motor vehicles of all kinds by the public has caused serious traffic congestion in certain areas of this state, and that inadequate parking facilities for vehicles have contributed to this congestion, not only to the point of seriously interfering with the primary use of such thoroughfares, but also of impeding rapid and effective firefighting and the disposition of police matters.

It is the intention of the general assembly to authorize the incorporation in the several municipalities in this state of public corporations to acquire, by purchase or otherwise, own, operate, lease and dispose of properties, to the end that such public corporations may be able to reduce this parking crisis by providing sufficient off-street parking facilities and to further incorporate such facilities within projects encompassing the full range of transportation modes relating to off-street parking, including, but not limited to, pedestrian ways, public transit and other modes of public and private transportation properly located in residential, commercial and industrial areas of the several municipalities in this state, and to vest such public corporations with all powers that may be necessary to enable them to accomplish such purposes.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with such intention.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 3.

7-65-104. Application — Approval — Existing authorities.

Whenever any number of natural persons, not fewer than three (3), a majority of whom are duly qualified electors of and taxpayers in the municipality, files with the governing body of the municipality an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of a parking authority of such municipality, the governing body shall proceed to consider such application. If the governing body, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the authority be formed, authorizes the persons making such application to proceed to form such authority, approves the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the authority, then the persons making such application shall execute, acknowledge and file a certificate of incorporation for the authority as provided in § 7-65-106.

Any existing parking authority may elect to be governed by this chapter upon application as provided in this section; provided, that provision has been made for the dissolution of such existing parking authority in accordance with the private or special act creating or authorizing the creation of the parking authority. Any such dissolution pursuant to this subsection (b) shall become finally effective only upon the approval of the certificate of incorporation of the authority by the secretary of state and the recording of the certificate of incorporation in the secretary of state's office as provided in § 7-65-106. The authority shall assume the operation of any facilities of the existing parking authority and shall account for any revenues from the existing parking authority in such a manner as not to impair the obligations of contract with reference to any bond issue or other legal obligation of the existing parking authority, and the authority shall fully preserve and protect the contract rights vested in the owners of any such bonds, obligations or contractual interests. The board of directors of such existing parking authority shall be qualified to act as applicant for the creation of an authority, notwithstanding any other provision of this section.

No authority may be formed unless such application shall have first been filed with the governing body of the municipality and the governing body shall have adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 4.

7-65-105. Certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The names and residences of the applicants, together with a recital that a majority of them are electors of and taxpayers in the municipality;

The name of the authority, which shall be the parking authority of the of , the blank spaces to be filled in with the name of the municipality, if such name shall be available for use by the authority and, if not available, then the incorporators shall designate some other similar name that is available;

A recital that permission to organize the authority has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of such resolution;

The location of the principal office of the authority, which shall be in the municipality;

The purposes for which the authority is proposed to be organized;

The number or minimum number of directors of the authority;

The period for the duration of the authority, which may be for a fixed term of years, may expire at the end of a period of six (6) years, unless by resolution of the governing body a renewal of the term is approved, or may be perpetual; and

Any other matter that the applicants may choose to insert in the certificate of incorporation, which shall not be inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of the state.

The certificate of incorporation shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each of the applicants before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds.

In the event an existing parking authority elects to be governed by this chapter, the certificate of incorporation shall contain such of the recitals set out in subsection (a) as may be appropriate under the circumstances.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 5; 1982, ch. 762, § 2.

7-65-106. Filing with and approval by secretary of state — Corporate existence.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with § 7-65-105, the certificate of incorporation shall be filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall then examine the certificate of incorporation. If the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained in the certificate of incorporation are correct, that there has been compliance with the requirements of § 7-65-105, and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another authority already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall approve the certificate of incorporation and record it in an appropriate book or record in the secretary of state's office.

When such certificate has been so made, filed and approved, the applicants shall constitute a public corporation under the name set out in the certificate of incorporation.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 6.

7-65-107. Amendment of certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation may at any time and from time to time be amended so as to make changes in the certificate of incorporation and make and add any provisions to the certificate of incorporation that might have been included in the certificate of incorporation in the first instance.

An amendment to the certificate of incorporation shall be effected in one (1) of the following means:

The members of the board of directors of the authority shall file with the governing body of the municipality an application, in writing, seeking permission to amend the certificate of incorporation, specifying in such application the amendment proposed to be made. Such governing bodies shall consider such application and, if it shall by appropriate resolution duly find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and shall authorize the amendment to be made, and shall approve the form of the appropriate amendment, then the persons making such application shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in such application, and shall file the amendment with the secretary of state. The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each member of the board of directors before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds. The secretary of state shall thereupon examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that there has been compliance with the requirements of this section and the proposed amendment is within the scope of what might be included in the original certificate of incorporation, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office. When such amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall thereupon become effective and a certificate of incorporation shall thereupon be amended to the extent provided in the amendment; or

The governing body of a municipality may amend the certificate of incorporation by the adoption of an appropriate resolution that finds that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the amendment be made. The resolution shall approve the form of the proposed amendment, and upon adoption, the governing body shall authorize the chief executive officer to execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in the resolution and file the amendment with the secretary of state. The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by the chief executive officer before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgment of deeds. The secretary of state shall thereupon examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that there has been compliance with the requirements of this section and the proposed amendments are within the scope of what might be included in the original certificate of incorporation, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office. When such amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall thereupon become effective and a certificate of incorporation shall thereupon be amended to the extent provided in the amendment.

No certificate of incorporation shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 7; 1982, ch. 762, § 1.

7-65-108. Board of directors.

The authority shall have a board of directors in which all powers of the authority shall be vested and that shall consist of any number of directors, no fewer than five (5), a majority of whom shall be duly qualified electors of and taxpayers in the municipality. The directors shall serve as such without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of their duties under this chapter. No director shall be an officer or employee of the municipality. The directors shall be appointed by the executive officer of the municipality with the approval of the governing body of the municipality, and they shall be so appointed that they shall hold office for staggered terms. At the time of the appointment of the first board of directors, the executive officer of the municipality shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing as near equal whole numbers as possible. The first term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years, the first term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years, the first term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years, and thereafter the terms of all directors shall be six (6) years; provided, that, if at the expiration of any term of office of any director, a successor has not been appointed, then the director whose term shall have expired shall continue to hold office until such director's successor shall have been so appointed.

In the event that an existing parking authority shall elect to be governed by this chapter, the executive officer of the municipality, with the approval of the governing body of the municipality, may appoint as directors of the authority the members of the board of directors of the existing parking authority serving immediately prior to its dissolution, and such directors shall thereafter serve in accordance with this section.

The directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect one (1) of their members as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as treasurer and one (1) as secretary, and such officers shall annually be elected thereafter in a like manner. The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same director. Any action taken by the directors under this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 8.

7-65-109. Purpose and powers of authority.

Authorities are authorized to be created to conduct necessary research activity; to maintain current data leading to efficient operation of off-street parking facilities, for the fulfillment of public needs for parking and the relation of parking to public transit and other public and private transportation modes, and to pedestrian ways; to promote safe and efficient access to and circulation within certain congested areas; to establish a permanent coordinated system of parking facilities and planning, designing, locating, financing, acquiring, holding, constructing, improving, maintaining and operating, owning, leasing, either in the capacity of lessor or lessee, land and facilities to be devoted to the parking of vehicles of any kind and the integration with related transportation systems and facilities.

The authority may exercise all powers necessary or convenient for performing the purposes set forth in subsection (a), including, but not limited to, the following:

Have succession in its corporate name for the period specified in the certificate of incorporation, unless sooner dissolved as provided in § 7-65-119;

Sue and be sued and prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Have and use a corporate seal and alter the seal at pleasure;

Make contracts of every name and nature, including property and liability insurance, and execute all instruments necessary or convenient for the carrying on of its business;

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, or otherwise, lease as lessee, and improve, maintain, extend, equip and furnish one (1) or more projects, which projects may be either within or without the corporate limits of the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized, including all real, personal, mixed, tangible or intangible properties or any interest in those properties that the board of directors of the authority may deem necessary in connection with the projects, and regardless of whether or not any such projects shall then be in existence;

Apply for, receive and accept grants for or in aid of any of its proper purposes from the United States or any agency of the United States, and from the state, any department or agency of the state, and any political subdivision of the state, and receive and accept money, property, labor or other things of value from any source whatever;

Maintain and operate any or all projects of the authority as provided in § 7-65-110;

Lease to any individual, partnership, firm, corporation or municipality any or all of its projects upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors shall deem proper and charge and collect rent for the lease and terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations of the lease, and include in any such lease, if desired, provisions that the lessee shall have options to renew the term of the lease for such period or periods and at such rent as shall be determined by the board of directors of the authority or purchase any or all of the projects of the authority or that upon payment of all the indebtedness of the authority it may lease or convey any or all of its projects to the lessees of the projects, with or without consideration;

Enter into contracts with the state, municipalities, corporations or authorities for the use of any project of the authority and fixing the amount to be paid for the use of the project;

Sell, exchange, donate, and convey any or all of its properties to the municipality or to any other municipality or public body or instrumentality or agency of the state or any county or incorporated city or county in the state, whenever its board of directors shall find any such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the authority was organized, or, except as provided in subdivision (b)(8), convey any such properties to any private person, corporation, or other private entity at not less than the appraised value of the property;

Borrow money and issue bonds for the purposes of carrying out any of its powers;

As security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds so issued and any agreements made in connection with the bonds, mortgage and pledge any or all of its projects or any part or parts of the projects, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and pledge all or any part of the revenues and receipts from the bonds or from any thereof, or funds received by the authority from any other sources;

Enter into contracts with any individual, partnership, firm, corporation or municipality pursuant to which such other party shall manage the operation of any or all of the projects of the authority, and agree to such terms and conditions as are determined to be expedient by the board of directors;

Enter into contracts with any individual, partnership, firm, corporation or municipality by which the authority is to manage and maintain, and collect fees, charges and other revenues from parking facilities owned by such other party, including contracts whereby the authority manages, maintains and collects the revenues from on-street parking meters or other facilities owned or controlled by municipalities of this state;

Employ and pay compensation to such employees and agents, including attorneys, as the board of directors shall deem necessary for the business of the authority;

Enter into contracts of group insurance for the benefit of its employees, and set up a retirement or pension fund for such employees, similar to that existing in the municipality with respect to which the authority is created;

Cooperate with the state, any county, city, town, public corporation, agency, department, or political subdivision of the state, and make such contracts with them as the board of directors may deem advisable to accomplish its corporate purposes; and

Exercise all powers expressly given in its certificate of incorporation or necessarily incident to those powers, and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the certificate of incorporation or this chapter, deemed expedient for the management of the authority's affairs.

Any meeting held by the board of directors for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public upon notice being duly given in accordance with the laws of this state.

Any lease of a project entered into pursuant to this chapter shall provide for rentals that, with other revenue derived from the project or otherwise available to the authority will be adequate to pay principal of and interest on such bonds as the same falls due, and pay such expenses of operating and maintaining the project as the board of directors shall determine to be necessary.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no provision of this chapter shall be construed to permit or to authorize any parking authority to exercise the power of eminent domain.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 9.

7-65-110. Operation of projects.

The authority, while operating any or all of its projects, has the power to make and enforce rules and regulations governing the use of any project and to fix, alter, charge and collect rents and other charges for the use of its facilities, at reasonable rates, to be determined exclusively by its board of directors, for the purpose of providing for the payment of the expenses of the authority, the construction, improvement, repair, maintenance and operation of its projects, the payment of the principal of and interest on its bonds, and to fulfill the terms and provisions of any agreements made with the purchasers or holders of any such bonds or with the municipality with respect to which the authority was created.

The authority has the power to lease adjunct portions of any project for commercial use, public or private, by the lessee, when, in the opinion of the board of directors, such leasing is desirable and feasible in order to assist in defraying the expenses of the authority. When, in the opinion of the board of directors, the space above any project is not needed for parking purposes, the authority may lease the right to develop the air space above any project for commercial uses other than parking, together with the right to use and occupy such space within the project as may be necessary for the purposes of access to and support of structures occupying the space above such project.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 10.

7-65-111. Bonds and notes.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, all bonds issued by the authority shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the leasing, operation or sale by the authority of its projects or any thereof or from income received by the authority from its operation of other parking facilities or from such funds as the authority may receive from other sources as are legally available for such purpose, all as may be designated in the proceedings of the board of directors under which the bonds shall be authorized to be issued; provided, that notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds may be retired out of the proceeds of such bonds. Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the authority at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denomination and of such terms and maturities, may be in fully registered form or in bearer form registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such installments and at such time or times, not exceeding forty (40) years, from the date of the bonds, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the authority, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this section, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued. If deemed advisable by the board of directors, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any bonds of the authority are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part of the bonds as may be specified in such proceedings, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such proceedings and as may be briefly recited on the face of the bonds, but nothing contained in this section shall be construed to confer on the authority any right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the proceedings under which they shall be issued. Any bonds of the authority may be sold at public or private sale for such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the authority to be most advantageous, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions that its board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of the bonds. Issuance by the authority of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds in connection with the same project or any other project, but the proceedings whereunder any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds.

Any bonds or notes of the authority at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the authority by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, but not exceeding:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums on the bonds or notes;

Unpaid interest on such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

In the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as provided in subdivision (d)(2), interest to accrue on such obligations from the date of delivery to the date of maturity or to the first redemption date, whichever shall be earlier; and

Expenses, premiums and commissions of the authority deemed by the board of directors to be necessary in connection with the issuance of the refunding bonds.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded by the refunding bonds, with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds of the sale to the payment of the obligations to be refunded by the refunding bonds, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows, either to:

The immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

The extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, then such proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but may also be used to pay interest on the refunding bonds prior to the retirement of the obligations being refunded. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by, the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank and trust company located in the state, if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of such obligations having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing in this subdivision (d)(2) shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded, but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 11.

7-65-112. Security for bonds.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the authority shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the principal and interest shall be made payable, and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such projects thereafter made. The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance or operation of the projects covered by the resolution, the fixing and collection of rents for any portions of the projects leased by the authority to others, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues, limitations on the issuance of additional bonds and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall deem advisable and not in conflict with this section. Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust were made shall have been fully paid or adequate provision shall be made for the payment of the principal and interest. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreements of the authority made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage and deed of trust executed as security for the bonds, the payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity or by foreclosure of any such mortgage and deed of trust or any one (1) or more of the remedies.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 12.

7-65-113. Pledge of on-street parking revenues.

Any authority operating a project financed from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this chapter may pledge to the payment of the bonds, in addition to all other revenues, all or any portion of such moneys as may be received from on-street parking meters pursuant to an agreement with the municipality within which such project shall be situated.

Upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution by its governing body, determining that a project financed and operated or proposed to be financed and operated within the municipality by an authority will be of benefit to the municipality in connection with its program of regulating and expediting vehicular traffic, and that the making available of on-street parking meter revenues to the authority will make the financing and operation of such project by the authority more feasible, resulting in increased benefits to the municipality and a more orderly flow of traffic, the municipality is authorized to enter into an agreement with the authority whereby the municipality shall pay over to the authority, as received, such portion of the revenues derived from its on-street parking meters as may be determined in such resolution; provided, that such revenues shall be used by the authority for the purpose of retiring indebtedness incurred in relation to the project. The municipality may covenant and agree in any such agreement to maintain its existing parking meters at their present locations and to maintain the charges for on-street metered parking at a rate at least equal to the rate in effect on the date of the agreement, and any such agreement may provide that the terms of the agreement may be enforced by the holder of any outstanding bonds of the authority to be affected by the agreement; provided, that all such provisions shall be subject to the right of the municipality to make changes and alterations pursuant to its police powers in regulating the flow of traffic.

It is hereby determined that, in financing, acquiring and operating any such project, the authority is performing a vital public function and that the use of parking meter revenues for such purpose and the payment of the parking meter revenues to the authority constitutes a proper public purpose of the municipality.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 13.

7-65-114. Use of bond proceeds.

Proceeds of bonds other than refunding bonds issued by the authority may be used solely for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering, or extending any project or projects, including the payment of interest on the bonds during construction of any such project and for six (6) months after the estimated date of completion, the payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with such project and the issuance of the bonds, and the establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for such payment.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 14.

7-65-115. Exemption from taxation.

The authority is hereby declared to be performing a public function in behalf of the municipality with respect to which the authority is organized and to be a public instrumentality of such municipality. Accordingly, the authority and all properties at any time owned by the authority and the income from the properties, and all bonds issued by the authority and the income from the bonds shall be exempt from all taxation in the state. Also, for purposes of the Tennessee Securities Act of 1980, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, bonds issued by the authority shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 15.

7-65-116. Nonliability of municipality.

The municipality shall not, in any event, be liable for the payment of principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority, or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever that may be undertaken by the authority, and none of the bonds of the authority or any of its agreements or obligations shall be construed to constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision whatsoever. In the event bonds of the authority are issued for a term greater than the life of the authority, the creating municipality shall assume the obligation of the bonds from and after the expiration of the period of duration of the authority.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 16; 1982, ch. 762, § 3.

7-65-117. Municipal leases and contracts with authorities — Tax.

Any municipality is authorized to enter into such leases or projects, or parts of projects, from an authority, for such term or terms and upon such conditions as may be determined by the governing body of such municipality, notwithstanding and without regard to the restrictions, prohibitions, or requirements of any other law, whether public or private; provided, that any such project or part of a project is situated within the municipality.

Whenever, and as often as a municipality enters into a lease with an authority under this chapter, the governing body of such municipality shall provide by ordinance or resolution, as the case may be, for the levy and collection of a direct annual tax sufficient to pay the annual rent payable under such lease as and when it becomes due and payable, and to pay any expenses of maintaining and operating the project required to be paid by the municipality under the terms of such lease or by instrument collateral to the lease; provided, that the ordinance or resolution may provide that the tax levy in each year shall be abated to the extent that there are on hand revenues from the operation of the leased project or any other funds of the municipality that are legally available for the making of rental payments under the lease. Such tax shall be assessed, levied, collected and paid in like manner as other taxes of the municipality and shall be in addition to all other taxes now or hereafter authorized to be levied by the municipality. Such tax shall not be included within any statutory or other limitation of rate or amount for such municipality, but shall be excluded from any statutory or other limitation of rate or amount and be in addition to any statutory or other limitation of rate or amount and in excess of any statutory or other limitation of rate or amount, notwithstanding and without regard to the prohibitions, restrictions or requirements of any other law, whether public or private. There shall be set aside from such tax levy into a special fund an amount sufficient for the payment of the annual rent, and the money in such fund shall be used exclusively for such purpose and shall not be used for any other purpose until the annual rent has been paid in full.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 17.

7-65-118. Nonprofit corporation — Disposition of earnings.

The authority shall be a nonprofit corporation and no part of its net earnings remaining after payment of its expenses shall inure to the benefit of any individual, firm or corporation, except that in the event the board of directors of the authority shall determine that sufficient provision has been made for the full payment of the expenses, bonds, and other obligations of the authority, then any net earnings of the authority thereafter accruing shall be paid to the municipality with respect to which the authority was organized; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent the board of directors from transferring all or any part of its properties in accordance with the terms of any lease entered into by the authority.

Acts 1980, ch. 826, § 18.